Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska10-616
Refunding bonds; issuance by annexing city or village.

Any city or village which has annexed all or part of any sanitary and improvement district, any road improvement district, or any fire protection district and has become legally liable for the bonds or warrants of the district or any part thereof shall also be authorized to exercise the powers set forth in section 10-615 with respect to such bonds or to issue refunding bonds upon such terms as the governing body shall deem appropriate to call and redeem such warrants at or before maturity.

Laws 1987, LB 623, § 2.